apertium-mar.mar.dix
		<!-- rel/corel -->
		<pardef n="__rel_corel">
			<e>		  <p><l>जो</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तो</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>जी</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ती</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>जे</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ते</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>जे</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ते</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ज्या</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्या</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>जी</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ती</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>		  <p><l>ज्याला</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्याला</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>जिला</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तिला</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ज्याला</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्या</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ज्यांना</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्यांना</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ज्यांना</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्यांना</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ज्यांना</l><r>जो<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्यांना</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       <p><l>जरी</l><r>जरी<s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>जरीही</l><r>जरी<s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>जरीसुद्धा</l><r>जरी<s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>तरी</l><r>तरी<s n="corel"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>तरीही</l><r>तरी<s n="corel"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>तरीसुद्धा</l><r>तरी<s n="corel"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>



		<!-- determiners -->

		<pardef n="__det">
			<e>		  <p><l>तो</l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ती</l><r>ती<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ते</l><r>ते<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्या</l><r>त्या<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ति</l><r>ति<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्या</l><r>त्या<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>			
			<e>		  <p><l>त्या</l><r>त्या<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ति</l><r>ति<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्या</l><r>त्या<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>


			<e>		  <p><l>ते</l><r>ते<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्या</l><r>त्या<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ती</l><r>ती<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्यां</l><r>त्यां<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>त्यां</l><r>त्यां<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>

			<e>		  <p><l>हा</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ही</l><r>ही<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>हे</l><r>हे<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ह्या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>हि</l><r>हि<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ह्या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>			
			<e r="LR"><p><l>या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>			
			<e>		  <p><l>ह्या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>हि</l><r>हि<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ह्या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>			


			<e>		  <p><l>हे</l><r>हे<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ह्या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ह्या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>या</l><r>ह्या<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ह्यां</l><r>ह्यां<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>यां</l><r>ह्यां<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>ह्यां</l><r>ह्यां<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>यां</l><r>ह्यां<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>एक</l><r>एक<s n="det"/><s n="indef"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>एका</l><r>एक<s n="det"/><s n="indef"/><s n="obl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>




		<!-- copula -->

		<e lm=""> 								<i></i><par n="__det" /></e>
		<e lm=""> 								<i></i><par n="__rel_corel" /></e>
